District of Columbia statutes.
5-412

Use of certain buildings granted.

The right of use and occupancy of the buildings and appurtenances known as the Union, Franklin, Columbia, and Anacostia Engine Houses, granted to the City of Washington for the purposes of the Fire Department, shall continue during the pleasure of Congress so long as used for such purposes.

R.S., D.C., § 192
Feb. 27, 1877, 19 Stat. 253, ch. 69, § 2
1981 Ed., § 4-312.
1973 Ed., § 4-412.